Florida, session 2026, SB1744.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âPresent subsections (5) through (35) of section 35 718.103, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 36 through (36), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 37 that section, to read: 38 718.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 39 (5)ââAudio conferenceâ means a real-time, audio-based 40 meeting between two or more people in different locations using 41 an audio-enabled device. 42 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (g) of subsection (12) of 43 section 718.111, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 44 718.111âThe association.â 45 (12)âOFFICIAL RECORDS.â 46 (a)âFrom the inception of the association, the association 47 shall maintain each of the following items, if applicable, which 48 constitutes the official records of the association: 49 1.âA copy of the plans, permits, warranties, and other 50 items provided by the developer under s. 718.301(4). 51 2.âA copy of the recorded declaration of condominium of 52 each condominium operated by the association and each amendment 53 to each declaration. 54 3.âA copy of the recorded bylaws of the association and 55 each amendment to the bylaws. 56 4.âA certified copy of the articles of incorporation of the 57 association, or other documents creating the association, and 58 each amendment thereto. 59 5.âA copy of the current rules of the association. 60 6.âA book or books or electronic records that contain the 61 minutes of all meetings of the association, the board of 62 administration, any committee, and the unit owners, and a 63 recording of all such meetings that are conducted by audio 64 conference or video conference, or both. If there are approved 65 minutes for a meeting held by audio conference or video 66 conference, or both, recordings of meetings that are conducted 67 by audio conference or video conference, or both, must be 68 maintained for at least 1 year after the date the audio or video 69 recording is posted as required under paragraph (g). 70 7.âA current roster of all unit owners and their mailing 71 addresses, unit identifications, voting certifications, and, if 72 known, telephone numbers. The association shall also maintain 73 the e-mail addresses and facsimile numbers of unit owners 74 consenting to receive notice by electronic transmission. In 75 accordance with sub-subparagraph (c)5.e., the e-mail addresses 76 and facsimile numbers are only accessible to unit owners if 77 consent to receive notice by electronic transmission is 78 provided, or if the unit owner has expressly indicated that such 79 personal information can be shared with other unit owners and 80 the unit owner has not provided the association with a request 81 to opt out of such dissemination with other unit owners. An 82 association must ensure that the e-mail addresses and facsimile 83 numbers are only used for the business operation of the 84 association and may not be sold or shared with outside third 85 parties. If such personal information is included in documents 86 that are released to third parties, other than unit owners, the 87 association must redact such personal information before the 88 document is disseminated. However, the association is not liable 89 for an inadvertent disclosure of the e-mail address or facsimile 90 number for receiving electronic transmission of notices unless 91 such disclosure was made with a knowing or intentional disregard 92 of the protected nature of such information. 93 8.âAll current insurance policies of the association and 94 condominiums operated by the association. 95 9.âA current copy of any management agreement, lease, or 96 other contract to which the association is a party or under 97 which the association or the unit owners have an obligation or 98 responsibility. 99 10.âBills of sale or transfer for all property owned by the 100 association. 101 11.âAccounting records for the association and separate 102 accounting records for each condominium that the association 103 operates. Any person who knowingly or intentionally defaces or 104 destroys such records, or who knowingly or intentionally fails 105 to create or maintain such records, with the intent of causing 106 harm to the association or one or more of its members, is 107 personally subject to a civil penalty pursuant to s. 108 718.501(1)(e). The accounting records must include, but are not 109 limited to: 110 a.âAccurate, itemized, and detailed records of all receipts 111 and expenditures, including all bank statements and ledgers. 112 b.âAll invoices, transaction receipts, or deposit slips 113 that substantiate any receipt or expenditure of funds by the 114 association. 115 c.âA current account and a monthly, bimonthly, or quarterly 116 statement of the account for each unit designating the name of 117 the unit owner, the due date and amount of each assessment, the 118 amount paid on the account, and the balance due. 119 d.âAll audits, reviews, accounting statements, structural 120 integrity reserve studies, and financial reports of the 121 association or condominium. Structural integrity reserve studies 122 must be maintained for at least 15 years after the study is 123 completed. 124 e.âAll contracts for work to be performed. Bids for work to 125 be performed are also considered official records and must be 126 maintained by the association for at least 1 year after receipt 127 of the bid. 128 12.âBallots, sign-in sheets, voting proxies, and all other 129 papers and electronic records relating to voting by unit owners, 130 which must be maintained for 1 year from the date of the 131 election, vote, or meeting to which the document relates, 132 notwithstanding paragraph (b). 133 13.âAll rental records if the association is acting as 134 agent for the rental of condominium units. 135 14.âA copy of the current question and answer sheet as 136 described in s. 718.504. 137 15.âA copy of the inspection reports described in ss. 138 553.899 and 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report 139 relating to a structural or life safety inspection of 140 condominium property. Such record must be maintained by the 141 association for 15 years after receipt of the report. 142 16.âBids for materials, equipment, or services. 143 17.âAll affirmative acknowledgments made pursuant to s. 144 718.121(4)(c). 145 18.âA copy of all building permits. 146 19.âA copy of all satisfactorily completed board member 147 educational certificates. 148 20.âA copy of all affidavits required by this chapter. 149 21.âAll other written records of the association not 150 specifically included in the foregoing which are related to the 151 operation of the association. 152 (g)1.âAn association managing a condominium with 25 or more 153 units which does not contain timeshare units shall post digital 154 copies of the documents specified in subparagraph 2. on its 155 website or make such documents available through an application 156 that can be downloaded on a mobile device. Unless a shorter 157 period is otherwise required, a document must be made available 158 on the associationâs website or made available for download 159 through an application on a mobile device within 30 days after 160 the association receives or creates an official record specified 161 in subparagraph 2. 162 a.âThe associationâs website or application must be: 163 (I)âAn independent website, application, or web portal 164 wholly owned and operated by the association; or 165 (II)âA website, application, or web portal operated by a 166 third-party provider with whom the association owns, leases, 167 rents, or otherwise obtains the right to operate a web page, 168 subpage, web portal, collection of subpages or web portals, or 169 an application which is dedicated to the associationâs 170 activities and on which required notices, records, and documents 171 may be posted or made available by the association. 172 b.âThe associationâs website or application must be 173 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web 174 portal, or other protected electronic location that is 175 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to unit 176 owners and employees of the association. 177 c.âUpon a unit ownerâs written request, the association 178 must provide the unit owner with a username and password and 179 access to the protected sections of the associationâs website or 180 application which contain any notices, records, or documents 181 that must be electronically provided. 182 2.âA current copy of the following documents must be posted 183 in digital format on the associationâs website or application: 184 a.âThe recorded declaration of condominium of each 185 condominium operated by the association and each amendment to 186 each declaration. 187 b.âThe recorded bylaws of the association and each 188 amendment to the bylaws. 189 c.âThe articles of incorporation of the association, or 190 other documents creating the association, and each amendment to 191 the articles of incorporation or other documents. The copy 192 posted pursuant to this sub-subparagraph must be a copy of the 193 articles of incorporation filed with the Department of State. 194 d.âThe rules of the association. 195 e.âThe approved minutes of all board of administration 196 meetings over the preceding 12 months. 197 f.âThe audio or video recording or a hyperlink to the audio 198 or video recording for all meetings of the association, the 199 board of administration, any committee, and the unit owners 200 which were are conducted by audio conference or video 201 conference, or both, over the preceding 12 months. 202 g.âA list of all executory contracts or documents to which 203 the association is a party or under which the association or the 204 unit owners have an obligation or responsibility and, after 205 bidding for the related materials, equipment, or services has 206 closed, a list of bids received by the association within the 207 past year. Summaries of bids for materials, equipment, or 208 services which exceed $500 must be maintained on the website or 209 application for 1 year. In lieu of summaries, complete copies of 210 the bids may be posted. 211 h.âThe annual budget required by s. 718.112(2)(f) and any 212 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting. 213 i.âThe financial report required by subsection (13) and any 214 monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a 215 meeting. 216 j.âThe certification of each director required by s. 217 718.112(2)(d)4.b. 218 k.âAll contracts or transactions between the association 219 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association 220 that is not an affiliated condominium association or any other 221 entity in which an association director is also a director or 222 officer and financially interested. 223 l.âAny contract or document regarding a conflict of 224 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss. 225 468.4335, 468.436(2)(b)6., and 718.3027(3). 226 m.âThe notice of any unit owner meeting and the agenda for 227 the meeting, as required by s. 718.112(2)(d)3., no later than 14 228 days before the meeting. The notice must be posted in plain view 229 on the front page of the website or application, or on a 230 separate subpage of the website or application labeled âNoticesâ 231 which is conspicuously visible and linked from the front page. 232 The association must also post on its website or application any 233 document to be considered and voted on by the owners during the 234 meeting or any document listed on the agenda at least 7 days 235 before the meeting at which the document or the information 236 within the document will be considered. 237 n.âNotice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other 238 document required for the meeting as required by s. 239 718.112(2)(c), which must be posted no later than the date 240 required for notice under s. 718.112(2)(c). 241 o.âThe inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and 242 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report relating to a 243 structural or life safety inspection of condominium property. 244 p.âThe associationâs most recent structural integrity 245 reserve study, if applicable. 246 q.âCopies of all building permits issued for ongoing or 247 planned construction. 248 r.âA copy of all affidavits required by this chapter. 249 3.âThe association shall ensure that the information and 250 records described in paragraph (c), which are not allowed to be 251 accessible to unit owners, are not posted on the associationâs 252 website or application. If protected information or information 253 restricted from being accessible to unit owners is included in 254 documents that are required to be posted on the associationâs 255 website or application, the association shall ensure the 256 information is redacted before posting the documents. 257 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its agent is 258 not liable for disclosing information that is protected or 259 restricted under this paragraph unless such disclosure was made 260 with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or 261 restricted nature of such information. 262 4.âThe failure of the association to post information 263 required under subparagraph 2. is not in and of itself 264 sufficient to invalidate any action or decision of the 265 associationâs board or its committees. 266 Section 3.âParagraphs (b) through (e) of subsection (2) of 267 section 718.112, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 268 718.112âBylaws.â 269 (2)âREQUIRED PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws shall provide for the 270 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include 271 the following: 272 (b)âQuorum; voting requirements; proxies.â 273 1.âUnless a lower number is provided in the bylaws, the 274 percentage of voting interests required to constitute a quorum 275 at a meeting of the members is a majority of the voting 276 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the 277 declaration, articles of incorporation, or bylaws, and except as 278 provided in subparagraph (d)4., decisions shall be made by a 279 majority of the voting interests represented at a meeting at 280 which a quorum is present. 281 2.âExcept as specifically otherwise provided herein, unit 282 owners in a residential condominium may not vote by general 283 proxy, but may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming 284 to a limited proxy form adopted by the division. A voting 285 interest or consent right allocated to a unit owned by the 286 association may not be exercised or considered for any purpose, 287 whether for a quorum, an election, or otherwise. Limited proxies 288 and general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited 289 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce 290 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (f)2.; for votes taken 291 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s. 718.111(13); 292 for votes taken to amend the declaration pursuant to s. 718.110; 293 for votes taken to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws 294 pursuant to this section; and for any other matter for which 295 this chapter requires or permits a vote of the unit owners. 296 Except as provided in paragraph (d), a proxy, limited or 297 general, may not be used in the election of board members in a 298 residential condominium. General proxies may be used for other 299 matters for which limited proxies are not required, and may be 300 used in voting for nonsubstantive changes to items for which a 301 limited proxy is required and given. Notwithstanding this 302 subparagraph, unit owners may vote in person at unit owner 303 meetings. This subparagraph does not limit the use of general 304 proxies or require the use of limited proxies for any agenda 305 item or election at any meeting of a timeshare condominium 306 association or a nonresidential condominium association. 307 3.âA proxy given is effective only for the specific meeting 308 for which originally given and any lawfully adjourned meetings 309 thereof. A proxy is not valid longer than 90 days after the date 310 of the first meeting for which it was given. Each proxy is 311 revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner 312 executing it. 313 4.âA member of the board of administration or a committee 314 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with 315 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend. 316 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or 317 against the action taken or to create a quorum. 318 5.âA board meeting may be conducted in person or by audio 319 conference or video conference, or both. A board or committee 320 memberâs participation in a meeting via telephone, real-time 321 audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real-time 322 electronic, audio, or video communication counts toward a 323 quorum, and such member may vote as if physically present. A 324 speaker must be used so that the conversation of such members 325 may be heard by the board or committee members attending in 326 person as well as by any unit owners present at a meeting. The 327 division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54 328 governing the requirements for meetings. 329 (c)âBoard of administration meetings.âIn a residential 330 condominium association of more than 10 units, the board of 331 administration shall meet at least once each quarter. At least 332 four times each year, the meeting agenda must include an 333 opportunity for members to ask questions of the board. Meetings 334 of the board of administration at which a quorum of the members 335 is present are open to all unit owners. Members of the board of 336 administration may use e-mail as a means of communication but 337 may not cast a vote on an association matter via e-mail. A unit 338 owner may tape record or videotape the meetings. The right to 339 attend such meetings includes the right to speak at such 340 meetings with reference to all designated agenda items and the 341 right to ask questions relating to reports on the status of 342 construction or repair projects, the status of revenues and 343 expenditures during the current fiscal year, and other issues 344 affecting the condominium. The division shall adopt reasonable 345 rules governing the tape recording and videotaping of the 346 meeting. The association may adopt written reasonable rules 347 governing the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner 348 statements. 349 1.âAdequate notice of all board meetings, which must 350 specifically identify all agenda items, must be posted 351 conspicuously on the condominium property at least 48 continuous 352 hours before the meeting except in an emergency. If the board 353 meeting is to be conducted via audio conference or video 354 conference, or both, the notice must state that such meeting 355 will be via audio conference or video conference, or both, and 356 must include a hyperlink and a conference telephone number for 357 unit owners to attend the meeting via video conference, as well 358 as the address of the physical location where the unit owners 359 can attend the meeting in person. If the meeting is conducted 360 via audio conference or video conference, or both, it must be 361 recorded and such recording must be maintained as an official 362 record of the association. If 20 percent of the voting interests 363 petition the board to address an item of business, the board, 364 within 60 days after receipt of the petition, must shall place 365 the item on the agenda at its next regular board meeting or at a 366 special meeting called for that purpose. An item not included on 367 the notice may be taken up on an emergency basis by a vote of at 368 least a majority plus one of the board members. Such emergency 369 action must be noticed and ratified at the next regular board 370 meeting. Written notice of a meeting at which a nonemergency 371 special assessment or an amendment to rules regarding unit use 372 will be considered must be mailed, delivered, or electronically 373 transmitted to the unit owners and posted conspicuously on the 374 condominium property at least 14 days before the meeting. 375 Evidence of compliance with this 14-day notice requirement must 376 be made by an affidavit executed by the person providing the 377 notice and filed with the official records of the association. 378 2.âUpon notice to the unit owners, the board shall, by duly 379 adopted rule, designate a specific location on the condominium 380 property at which all notices of board meetings must be posted. 381 If there is no condominium property at which notices can be 382 posted, notices must shall be mailed, delivered, or 383 electronically transmitted to each unit owner at least 14 days 384 before the meeting. In lieu of or in addition to the physical 385 posting of the notice on the condominium property, the 386 association may, by reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for 387 conspicuously posting and repeatedly broadcasting the notice and 388 the agenda on a closed-circuit cable television system serving 389 the condominium association. However, if broadcast notice is 390 used in lieu of a notice physically posted on condominium 391 property, the notice and agenda must be broadcast at least four 392 times every broadcast hour of each day that a posted notice is 393 otherwise required under this section. If broadcast notice is 394 provided, the notice and agenda must be broadcast in a manner 395 and for a sufficient continuous length of time so as to allow an 396 average reader to observe the notice and read and comprehend the 397 entire content of the notice and the agenda. In addition to any 398 of the authorized means of providing notice of a meeting of the 399 board, the association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for 400 conspicuously posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a 401 website serving the condominium association for at least the 402 minimum period of time for which a notice of a meeting is also 403 required to be physically posted on the condominium property. 404 Any rule adopted must shall, in addition to other matters, 405 include a requirement that the association send an electronic 406 notice in the same manner as a notice for a meeting of the 407 members, which must include a hyperlink to the website at which 408 the notice is posted, to unit owners whose e-mail addresses are 409 included in the associationâs official records. 410 3.âNotice of any meeting in which regular or special 411 assessments against unit owners are to be considered must 412 specifically state that assessments will be considered and 413 provide the estimated cost and description of the purposes for 414 such assessments. If an agenda item relates to the approval of a 415 contract for goods or services, a copy of the contract must be 416 provided with the notice and be made available for inspection 417 and copying upon a written request from a unit owner or made 418 available on the associationâs website or through an application 419 that can be downloaded on a mobile device. 420 4.âMeetings of a committee to take final action on behalf 421 of the board or make recommendations to the board regarding the 422 association budget are subject to this paragraph. Meetings of a 423 committee that does not take final action on behalf of the board 424 or make recommendations to the board regarding the association 425 budget are subject to this section, unless those meetings are 426 exempted from this section by the bylaws of the association. 427 5.âNotwithstanding any other law, the requirement that 428 board meetings and committee meetings be open to the unit owners 429 does not apply to: 430 a.âMeetings between the board or a committee and the 431 associationâs attorney, with respect to proposed or pending 432 litigation, if the meeting is held for the purpose of seeking or 433 rendering legal advice; or 434 b.âBoard meetings held for the purpose of discussing 435 personnel matters. 436 (d)âUnit owner meetings.â 437 1.âAn annual meeting of the unit owners must be held at the 438 location provided in the association bylaws and, if the bylaws 439 are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held within 440 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same county 441 as the condominium property. However, such distance requirement 442 does not apply to an association governing a timeshare 443 condominium. If a unit owner meeting is conducted via audio 444 conference or video conference, or both, a unit owner may vote 445 electronically in the manner provided in s. 718.128. 446 2.âUnit owner meetings, including the annual meeting of the 447 unit owners, may be conducted in person or via audio conference 448 or video conference, or both. If the annual meeting of the unit 449 owners is conducted via audio conference or video conference, or 450 both, a quorum of the members of the board of administration 451 must be physically present at the physical location where unit 452 owners can attend the meeting. The location must be provided in 453 the association bylaws and, if the bylaws are silent as to the 454 location, the meeting must be held within 15 miles of the 455 condominium property or within the same county as the 456 condominium property. If the unit owner meeting is conducted via 457 audio or video conference, or both, the audio conference or 458 video conference, or both, must be recorded and such recording 459 must be maintained as an official record of the association. The 460 division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54 461 governing the requirements for meetings. 462 3.âUnless the bylaws provide otherwise, a vacancy on the 463 board caused by the expiration of a directorâs term must be 464 filled by electing a new board member, and the election must be 465 by secret ballot. An election is not required if the number of 466 vacancies equals or exceeds the number of candidates. For 467 purposes of this paragraph, the term âcandidateâ means an 468 eligible person who has timely submitted the written notice, as 469 described in sub-subparagraph 4.a., of his or her intention to 470 become a candidate. Except in a timeshare or nonresidential 471 condominium, or if the staggered term of a board member does not 472 expire until a later annual meeting, or if all membersâ terms 473 would otherwise expire but there are no candidates, the terms of 474 all board members expire at the annual meeting, and such members 475 may stand for reelection unless prohibited by the bylaws. Board 476 members may serve terms longer than 1 year if permitted by the 477 bylaws or articles of incorporation. A board member may not 478 serve more than 8 consecutive years unless approved by an 479 affirmative vote of unit owners representing two-thirds of all 480 votes cast in the election or unless there are not enough 481 eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at the 482 time of the vacancy. Only board service that occurs on or after 483 July 1, 2018, may be used when calculating a board memberâs term 484 limit. If the number of board members whose terms expire at the 485 annual meeting equals or exceeds the number of candidates, the 486 candidates become members of the board effective upon the 487 adjournment of the annual meeting. Unless the bylaws provide 488 otherwise, any remaining vacancies shall be filled by the 489 affirmative vote of the majority of the directors making up the 490 newly constituted board even if the directors constitute less 491 than a quorum or there is only one director. In a residential 492 condominium association of more than 10 units or in a 493 residential condominium association that does not include 494 timeshare units or timeshare interests, co-owners of a unit may 495 not serve as members of the board of directors at the same time 496 unless they own more than one unit or unless there are not 497 enough eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at 498 the time of the vacancy. A unit owner in a residential 499 condominium desiring to be a candidate for board membership must 500 comply with sub-subparagraph 4.a. and must be eligible to be a 501 candidate to serve on the board of directors at the time of the 502 deadline for submitting a notice of intent to run in order to 503 have his or her name listed as a proper candidate on the ballot 504 or to serve on the board. A person who has been suspended or 505 removed by the division under this chapter, or who is delinquent 506 in the payment of any assessment due to the association, is not 507 eligible to be a candidate for board membership and may not be 508 listed on the ballot. For purposes of this paragraph, a person 509 is delinquent if a payment is not made by the due date as 510 specifically identified in the declaration of condominium, 511 bylaws, or articles of incorporation. If a due date is not 512 specifically identified in the declaration of condominium, 513 bylaws, or articles of incorporation, the due date is the first 514 day of the assessment period. A person who has been convicted of 515 any felony in this state or in a United States District or 516 Territorial Court, or who has been convicted of any offense in 517 another jurisdiction which would be considered a felony if 518 committed in this state, is not eligible for board membership 519 unless such felonâs civil rights have been restored for at least 520 5 years as of the date such person seeks election to the board. 521 The validity of an action by the board is not affected if it is 522 later determined that a board member is ineligible for board 523 membership due to having been convicted of a felony. This 524 subparagraph does not limit the term of a member of the board of 525 a nonresidential or timeshare condominium. 526 4.âThe bylaws must provide the method of calling meetings 527 of unit owners, including annual meetings. Written notice of an 528 annual meeting must include an agenda; be mailed, hand 529 delivered, or electronically transmitted to each unit owner at 530 least 14 days before the annual meeting; and be posted in a 531 conspicuous place on the condominium property or association 532 property at least 14 continuous days before the annual meeting. 533 Written notice of a meeting other than an annual meeting must 534 include an agenda; be mailed, hand delivered, or electronically 535 transmitted to each unit owner; and be posted in a conspicuous 536 place on the condominium property or association property within 537 the timeframe specified in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not 538 specify a timeframe for written notice of a meeting other than 539 an annual meeting, notice must be provided at least 14 540 continuous days before the meeting. Upon notice to the unit 541 owners, the board shall, by duly adopted rule, designate a 542 specific location on the condominium property or association 543 property at which all notices of unit owner meetings must be 544 posted. This requirement does not apply if there is no 545 condominium property for posting notices. In addition to the 546 physical posting of meeting notices, the association may, by 547 reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously posting and 548 repeatedly broadcasting the notice and the agenda on a closed 549 circuit cable television system serving the condominium 550 association. If broadcast notice is provided, the notice and 551 agenda must be broadcast in a manner and for a sufficient 552 continuous length of time so as to allow an average reader to 553 observe the notice and read and comprehend the entire content of 554 the notice and the agenda. In addition to any of the authorized 555 means of providing notice of a meeting of the board, the 556 association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously 557 posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a website serving 558 the condominium association for at least the minimum period of 559 time for which a notice of a meeting is also required to be 560 physically posted on the condominium property. Any rule adopted 561 shall, in addition to other matters, include a requirement that 562 the association send an electronic notice in the same manner as 563 a notice for a meeting of the members, which must include a 564 hyperlink to the website at which the notice is posted, to unit 565 owners whose e-mail addresses are included in the associationâs 566 official records. Unless a unit owner waives in writing the 567 right to receive notice of the annual meeting, such notice must 568 be hand delivered, mailed, or electronically transmitted to each 569 unit owner. Notice for meetings and notice for all other 570 purposes must be mailed to each unit owner at the address last 571 furnished to the association by the unit owner, or hand 572 delivered to each unit owner. However, if a unit is owned by 573 more than one person, the association must provide notice to the 574 address that the developer identifies for that purpose and 575 thereafter as one or more of the owners of the unit advise the 576 association in writing, or if no address is given or the owners 577 of the unit do not agree, to the address provided on the deed of 578 record. An officer of the association, or the manager or other 579 person providing notice of the association meeting, must provide 580 an affidavit or United States Postal Service certificate of 581 mailing, to be included in the official records of the 582 association affirming that the notice was mailed or hand 583 delivered in accordance with this provision. 584 5.âThe members of the board of a residential condominium 585 shall be elected by written ballot or voting machine. Proxies 586 may not be used in electing the board in general elections or 587 elections to fill vacancies caused by recall, resignation, or 588 otherwise, unless otherwise provided in this chapter. This 589 subparagraph does not apply to an association governing a 590 timeshare condominium. 591 a.âAt least 60 days before a scheduled election, the 592 association shall mail, deliver, or electronically transmit, by 593 separate association mailing or included in another association 594 mailing, delivery, or transmission, including regularly 595 published newsletters, to each unit owner entitled to a vote, a 596 first notice of the date of the election. A unit owner or other 597 eligible person desiring to be a candidate for the board must 598 give written notice of his or her intent to be a candidate to 599 the association at least 40 days before a scheduled election. 600 Together with the written notice and agenda as set forth in 601 subparagraph 3., the association shall mail, deliver, or 602 electronically transmit a second notice of the election to all 603 unit owners entitled to vote, together with a ballot that lists 604 all candidates not less than 14 days or more than 34 days before 605 the date of the election. Upon request of a candidate, an 606 information sheet, no larger than 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches, 607 which must be furnished by the candidate at least 35 days before 608 the election, must be included with the mailing, delivery, or 609 transmission of the ballot, with the costs of mailing, delivery, 610 or electronic transmission and copying to be borne by the 611 association. The association is not liable for the contents of 612 the information sheets prepared by the candidates. In order to 613 reduce costs, the association may print or duplicate the 614 information sheets on both sides of the paper. The division 615 shall by rule establish voting procedures consistent with this 616 sub-subparagraph, including rules establishing procedures for 617 giving notice by electronic transmission and rules providing for 618 the secrecy of ballots. Elections are shall be decided by a 619 plurality of ballots cast. There is no quorum requirement; 620 however, at least 20 percent of the eligible voters must cast a 621 ballot in order to have a valid election. A unit owner may not 622 authorize any other person to vote his or her ballot, and any 623 ballots improperly cast are invalid. A unit owner who violates 624 this provision may be fined by the association in accordance 625 with s. 718.303. A unit owner who needs assistance in casting 626 the ballot for the reasons stated in s. 101.051 may obtain such 627 assistance. The regular election must occur on the date of the 628 annual meeting. Notwithstanding this sub-subparagraph, an 629 election is not required unless more candidates file notices of 630 intent to run or are nominated than board vacancies exist. 631 b.âA director of a board of an association of a residential 632 condominium shall: 633 (I)âCertify in writing to the secretary of the association 634 that he or she has read the associationâs declaration of 635 condominium, articles of incorporation, bylaws, and current 636 written policies; that he or she will work to uphold such 637 documents and policies to the best of his or her ability; and 638 that he or she will faithfully discharge his or her fiduciary 639 responsibility to the associationâs members. 640 (II)âSubmit to the secretary of the association a 641 certificate of having satisfactorily completed the educational 642 curriculum administered by the division or a division-approved 643 condominium education provider. The educational curriculum must 644 be at least 4 hours long and include instruction on milestone 645 inspections, structural integrity reserve studies, elections, 646 recordkeeping, financial literacy and transparency, levying of 647 fines, and notice and meeting requirements. 648 649 Each newly elected or appointed director must submit to the 650 secretary of the association the written certification and 651 educational certificate within 1 year before being elected or 652 appointed or 90 days after the date of election or appointment. 653 A director of an association of a residential condominium who 654 was elected or appointed before July 1, 2024, must comply with 655 the written certification and educational certificate 656 requirements in this sub-subparagraph by June 30, 2025. The 657 written certification and educational certificate is valid for 7 658 years after the date of issuance and does not have to be 659 resubmitted as long as the director serves on the board without 660 interruption during the 7-year period. A director who is 661 appointed by the developer may satisfy the educational 662 certificate requirement in sub-sub-subparagraph (II) for any 663 subsequent appointment to a board by a developer within 7 years 664 after the date of issuance of the most recent educational 665 certificate, including any interruption of service on a board or 666 appointment to a board in another association within that 7-year 667 period. One year after submission of the most recent written 668 certification and educational certificate, and annually 669 thereafter, a director of an association of a residential 670 condominium must submit to the secretary of the association a 671 certificate of having satisfactorily completed at least 1 hour 672 of continuing education administered by the division, or a 673 division-approved condominium education provider, relating to 674 any recent changes to this chapter and the related 675 administrative rules during the past year. A director of an 676 association of a residential condominium who fails to timely 677 file the written certification and educational certificate is 678 suspended from service on the board until he or she complies 679 with this sub-subparagraph. The board may temporarily fill the 680 vacancy during the period of suspension. The secretary shall 681 cause the association to retain a directorâs written 682 certification and educational certificate for inspection by the 683 members for 7 years after a directorâs election or the duration 684 of the directorâs uninterrupted tenure, whichever is longer. 685 Failure to have such written certification and educational 686 certificate on file does not affect the validity of any board 687 action. 688 c.âAny challenge to the election process must be commenced 689 within 60 days after the election results are announced. 690 6.âAny approval by unit owners called for by this chapter 691 or the applicable declaration or bylaws, including, but not 692 limited to, the approval requirement in s. 718.111(8), must be 693 made at a duly noticed meeting of unit owners and is subject to 694 all requirements of this chapter or the applicable condominium 695 documents relating to unit owner decisionmaking, except that 696 unit owners may take action by written agreement, without 697 meetings, on matters for which action by written agreement 698 without meetings is expressly allowed by the applicable bylaws 699 or declaration or any law that provides for such action. 700 7.âUnit owners may waive notice of specific meetings if 701 allowed by the applicable bylaws or declaration or any law. 702 Notice of meetings of the board of administration; unit owner 703 meetings, except unit owner meetings called to recall board 704 members under paragraph (l); and committee meetings may be given 705 by electronic transmission to unit owners who consent to receive 706 notice by electronic transmission. A unit owner who consents to 707 receiving notices by electronic transmission is solely 708 responsible for removing or bypassing filters that block receipt 709 of mass e-mails sent to members on behalf of the association in 710 the course of giving electronic notices. 711 8.âUnit owners have the right to participate in meetings of 712 unit owners with reference to all designated agenda items. 713 However, the association may adopt reasonable rules governing 714 the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner participation. 715 9.âA unit owner may tape record or videotape a meeting of 716 the unit owners subject to reasonable rules adopted by the 717 division. 718 10.âUnless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any vacancy 719 occurring on the board before the expiration of a term may be 720 filled by the affirmative vote of the majority of the remaining 721 directors, even if the remaining directors constitute less than 722 a quorum, or by the sole remaining director. In the alternative, 723 a board may hold an election to fill the vacancy, in which case 724 the election procedures must conform to sub-subparagraph 4.a. 725 unless the association governs 10 units or fewer and has opted 726 out of the statutory election process, in which case the bylaws 727 of the association control. Unless otherwise provided in the 728 bylaws, a board member appointed or elected under this section 729 shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the seat being 730 filled. Filling vacancies created by recall is governed by 731 paragraph (l) and rules adopted by the division. 732 11.âThis chapter does not limit the use of general or 733 limited proxies, require the use of general or limited proxies, 734 or require the use of a written ballot or voting machine for any 735 agenda item or election at any meeting of a timeshare 736 condominium association or nonresidential condominium 737 association. 738 739 Notwithstanding subparagraph (b)2. and sub-subparagraph 4.a., an 740 association of 10 or fewer units may, by affirmative vote of a 741 majority of the total voting interests, provide for different 742 voting and election procedures in its bylaws, which may be by a 743 proxy specifically delineating the different voting and election 744 procedures. The different voting and election procedures may 745 provide for elections to be conducted by limited or general 746 proxy. 747 (e)âBudget meeting.â 748 1.âAny meeting at which a proposed annual budget of an 749 association will be considered by the board or unit owners is 750 shall be open to all unit owners. A meeting of the board or unit 751 owners at which a proposed annual association budget will be 752 considered may be conducted by audio conference or video 753 conference, or both. The division shall adopt rules pursuant to 754 ss. 120.536 and 120.54 governing the requirements for such 755 meetings. A sound transmitting device must be used so that the 756 conversation of such members may be heard by the board or 757 committee members attending in person, as well as any unit 758 owners present at the meeting. At least 14 days before such a 759 meeting, the board shall hand deliver to each unit owner, mail 760 to each unit owner at the address last furnished to the 761 association by the unit owner, or electronically transmit to the 762 location furnished by the unit owner for that purpose a notice 763 of such meeting and a copy of the proposed annual budget. An 764 officer or a manager of the association, or other person 765 providing notice of such meeting, shall execute an affidavit 766 evidencing compliance with such notice requirement, and such 767 affidavit shall be filed among the official records of the 768 association. 769 2.a.âIf a board proposes in any fiscal year an annual 770 budget which requires assessments against unit owners which 771 exceed 115 percent of assessments for the preceding fiscal year, 772 the board must shall simultaneously propose a substitute budget 773 that does not include any discretionary expenditures that are 774 not required to be in the budget. The substitute budget must be 775 proposed at the budget meeting before the adoption of the annual 776 budget. At least 14 days before such budget meeting in which a 777 substitute budget will be proposed, the board shall hand deliver 778 to each unit owner, or mail to each unit owner at the address 779 last furnished to the association, a notice of the meeting. An 780 officer or manager of the association, or other person providing 781 notice of such meeting shall execute an affidavit evidencing 782 compliance with this notice requirement, and such affidavit must 783 shall be filed among the official records of the association. 784 Unit owners shall must consider and may adopt a substitute 785 budget at the meeting. A substitute budget is adopted if 786 approved by a majority of all voting interests unless the bylaws 787 require adoption by a greater percentage of voting interests. If 788 a substitute budget is not adopted, the annual budget previously 789 initially proposed by the board may be adopted. 790 b.âAny determination of whether assessments exceed 115 791 percent of assessments for the previous prior fiscal year must 792 shall exclude any authorized provision for required reserves for 793 repair or replacement of the condominium property; anticipated 794 expenses of the association which the board does not expect to 795 be incurred on a regular or annual basis for the repair, 796 maintenance, or replacement of the items listed in paragraph 797 (g); and insurance premiums. 798 c.âIf the developer controls the board, assessments may not 799 exceed 115 percent of assessments for the prior fiscal year 800 unless approved by a majority of all voting interests. 801 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 802 718.1265, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 803 718.1265âAssociation emergency powers.â 804 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 805 prohibited by the declaration of condominium, the articles, or 806 the bylaws of an association, and consistent with s. 617.0830, 807 the board of administration, in response to damage or injury 808 caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency, as 809 defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is 810 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the locale in which the 811 condominium is located, may exercise the following powers: 812 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 813 and membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, 814 real-time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar 815 real-time electronic audio or video communication with notice 816 given as is practicable. Such notice may be given in any 817 practicable manner, including publication, radio, United States 818 mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public service 819 announcements, and conspicuous posting on the condominium 820 property or association property or any other means the board 821 deems reasonable under the circumstances. Notice of decisions 822 also may be communicated as provided in this paragraph. 823 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 824 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 825 719.106âBylaws; cooperative ownership.â 826 (1)âMANDATORY PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws or other cooperative 827 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not, 828 they shall be deemed to include the following: 829 (b)âQuorum; voting requirements; proxies.â 830 1.âUnless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the percentage 831 of voting interests required to constitute a quorum at a meeting 832 of the members shall be a majority of voting interests, and 833 decisions shall be made by owners of a majority of the voting 834 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, or in the 835 articles of incorporation, bylaws, or other cooperative 836 documents, and except as provided in subparagraph (d)1., 837 decisions shall be made by owners of a majority of the voting 838 interests represented at a meeting at which a quorum is present. 839 2.âExcept as specifically otherwise provided herein, after 840 January 1, 1992, unit owners may not vote by general proxy, but 841 may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming to a 842 limited proxy form adopted by the division. Limited proxies and 843 general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited 844 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce 845 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (j)2., for votes taken 846 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s. 847 719.104(4)(b), for votes taken to amend the articles of 848 incorporation or bylaws pursuant to this section, and for any 849 other matter for which this chapter requires or permits a vote 850 of the unit owners. Except as provided in paragraph (d), after 851 January 1, 1992, a no proxy, limited or general, may not shall 852 be used in the election of board members. General proxies may be 853 used for other matters for which limited proxies are not 854 required, and may also be used in voting for nonsubstantive 855 changes to items for which a limited proxy is required and 856 given. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, unit 857 owners may vote in person at unit owner meetings. This section 858 does not Nothing contained herein shall limit the use of general 859 proxies or require the use of limited proxies or require the use 860 of limited proxies for any agenda item or election at any 861 meeting of a timeshare cooperative. 862 3.âAny proxy given is shall be effective only for the 863 specific meeting for which originally given and any lawfully 864 adjourned meetings thereof. In no event shall any proxy be valid 865 for a period longer than 90 days after the date of the first 866 meeting for which it was given. Every proxy is shall be 867 revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner 868 executing it. 869 4.âA member of the board of administration or a committee 870 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with 871 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend. 872 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or 873 against the action taken and may not be used for the purposes of 874 creating a quorum. 875 5.âA board member or committee member participating in a 876 meeting via telephone, real-time audioconferencing or 877 videoconferencing, or similar real-time electronic audio or 878 video communication counts toward a quorum, and such member may 879 vote as if physically present. A speaker must be used so that 880 the conversation of such members may be heard by the board or 881 committee members attending in person, as well as by any unit 882 owners present at a meeting. 883 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 884 719.128, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 885 719.128âAssociation emergency powers.â 886 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 887 prohibited by the cooperative documents, and consistent with s. 888 617.0830, the board of administration, in response to damage or 889 injury caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency, 890 as defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is 891 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the 892 cooperative, may exercise the following powers: 893 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 894 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real 895 time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real 896 time electronic audio or video communication after notice of the 897 meetings and board decisions is provided in as practicable a 898 manner as possible, including via publication, radio, United 899 States mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public 900 service announcements, conspicuous posting on the cooperative 901 property, or any other means the board deems appropriate under 902 the circumstances. Notice of decisions may also be communicated 903 as provided in this paragraph. 904 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 905 720.316, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 906 720.316âAssociation emergency powers.â 907 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 908 prohibited by the declaration or other recorded governing 909 documents, and consistent with s. 617.0830, the board of 910 directors, in response to damage or injury caused by or 911 anticipated in connection with an emergency, as defined in s. 912 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is declared pursuant 913 to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the association, may 914 exercise the following powers: 915 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 916 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real 917 time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real 918 time electronic audio or video communication after notice of the 919 meetings and board decisions is provided in as practicable a 920 manner as possible, including via publication, radio, United 921 States mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public 922 service announcements, conspicuous posting on the common area, 923 or any other means the board deems appropriate under the 924 circumstances. Notice of decisions may also be communicated as 925 provided in this paragraph. 926 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 927 718.501, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (u) of that 928 subsection is reenacted, to read: 929 718.501âAuthority, responsibility, and duties of Division 930 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.â 931 (1)âThe division may enforce and ensure compliance with 932 this chapter and rules relating to the development, 933 construction, sale, lease, ownership, operation, and management 934 of residential condominium units and complaints. In performing 935 its duties, the division has complete jurisdiction to 936 investigate complaints and enforce compliance with respect to 937 associations that are still under developer control or the 938 control of a bulk assignee or bulk buyer pursuant to part VII of 939 this chapter and complaints against developers, bulk assignees, 940 or bulk buyers involving improper turnover or failure to 941 turnover, pursuant to s. 718.301. However, after turnover has 942 occurred, the division has jurisdiction to review records and 943 investigate complaints related only to: 944 (a)1.âProcedural aspects and records relating to financial 945 issues, including annual financial reporting under s. 946 718.111(13); assessments for common expenses, fines, and 947 commingling of reserve and operating funds under s. 718.111(14); 948 use of debit cards for unintended purposes under s. 718.111(15); 949 the annual operating budget and the allocation of reserve funds 950 under s. 718.112(2)(f); financial records under s. 951 718.111(12)(a)11.; and any other record necessary to determine 952 the revenues and expenses of the association. 953 2.âElections, including election and voting requirements 954 under s. 718.112(2)(b) and (d), recall of board members under s. 955 718.112(2)(l), electronic voting under s. 718.128, and elections 956 that occur during an emergency under s. 718.1265(1)(a). 957 3.âThe maintenance of and unit owner access to association 958 records under s. 718.111(12), including, but not limited to, 959 audio or video recordings. 960 4.âThe procedural aspects of meetings, including unit owner 961 meetings, quorums, voting requirements, proxies, board of 962 administration meetings, and budget meetings under s. 963 718.112(2). 964 5.âThe disclosure of conflicts of interest under ss. 965 718.111(1)(a) and 718.3027, including limitations contained in 966 s. 718.111(3)(f). 967 6.âThe removal of a board director or officer under ss. 968 718.111(1)(a) and (15) and 718.112(2)(p) and (q). 969 7.âThe procedural completion of structural integrity 970 reserve studies under s. 718.112(2)(g) and the milestone 971 inspections under s. 553.899. 972 8.âCompletion of repairs required by a milestone inspection 973 under s. 553.899. 974 9.âAny written inquiries by unit owners to the association 975 relating to such matters, including written inquiries under s. 976 718.112(2)(a)2. 977 10.âThe requirement for associations to maintain an 978 insurance policy or fidelity bonding for all persons who control 979 or disperse funds of the association under s. 718.111(11)(h). 980 11.âBoard member education requirements under s. 981 718.112(2)(d)5.b. 982 12.âReporting requirements for structural integrity reserve 983 studies under subsection (3) and under s. 718.112(2)(g)12. 984 (u)âIf the division receives a complaint regarding access 985 to official records on the associationâs website or through an 986 application that can be downloaded on a mobile device under s. 987 718.111(12)(g), the division may request access to the 988 associationâs website or application and investigate. The 989 division may adopt rules to carry out this paragraph. 990 Section 9.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph 991 (e) of subsection (2) of section 718.503, Florida Statutes, are 992 amended to read: 993 718.503âDeveloper disclosure prior to sale; nondeveloper 994 unit owner disclosure prior to sale; voidability.â 995 (1)âDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.â 996 (d)âMilestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or 997 structural integrity reserve study.âIf the association is 998 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described 999 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover 1000 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural 1001 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed 1002 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the 1003 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into 1004 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit 1005 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that 1006 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a 1007 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve 1008 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study, 1009 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a 1010 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural 1011 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after 1012 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall 1013 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the 1014 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a 1015 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the 1016 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in 1017 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover 1018 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural 1019 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after 1020 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall 1021 contain in conspicuous type: 1022 1.âA clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES 1023 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 1024 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 1025 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 1026 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 1027 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 1028 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 1029 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 1030 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15 1031 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE 1032 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and 1033 2.âA clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY 1034 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYERâS INTENTION TO 1035 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL 1036 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE 1037 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 1038 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 1039 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 1040 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 1041 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 1042 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 1043 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 1044 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED 1045 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER 1046 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15 1047 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER 1048 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED 1049 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN 1050 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER 1051 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), 1052 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT 1053 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 1054 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF 1055 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYERâS RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL 1056 TERMINATE AT CLOSING. 1057 1058 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this 1059 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before 1060 closing. 1061 (2)âNONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.â 1062 (e)âIf the association is required to have completed a 1063 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover 1064 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or 1065 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and 1066 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the 1067 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve 1068 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for 1069 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type 1070 a statement indicating that the association is required to have 1071 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a 1072 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such 1073 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association 1074 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in 1075 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each 1076 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a 1077 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement 1078 indicating that the association is not required to have a 1079 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as 1080 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone 1081 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection 1082 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1, 1083 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract 1084 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a 1085 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type: 1086 1.âA clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES 1087 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 1088 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 1089 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 1090 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 1091 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 1092 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 1093 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 1094 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7 1095 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE 1096 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and 1097 2.âA clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY 1098 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYERâS INTENTION TO 1099 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL 1100 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE 1101 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 1102 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 1103 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 1104 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 1105 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 1106 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 1107 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 1108 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED 1109 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER 1110 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7 1111 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER 1112 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED 1113 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN 1114 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER 1115 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), 1116 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT 1117 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 1118 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF 1119 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYERâS RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL 1120 TERMINATE AT CLOSING. 1121 1122 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this 1123 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before 1124 closing. 1125 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1126 made by this act to section 719.106, Florida Statutes, in a 1127 reference thereto, section 723.0791, Florida Statutes, is 1128 reenacted to read: 1129 723.0791âMobile home cooperative homeownersâ associations; 1130 elections.âThe provisions of s. 719.106(1)(b) notwithstanding, 1131 the election of board members in a mobile home cooperative 1132 homeownersâ association may be carried out in the manner 1133 provided for in the bylaws of the association. A mobile home 1134 cooperative is a residential cooperative consisting of real 1135 property to which 10 or more mobile homes are located or are 1136 affixed. 1137 Section 11.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.